Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-260
Game and Parks Commission; convey described property.

The Game and Parks Commission is authorized and directed to convey to the Department of Roads the following described real estate situated in the county of Dawson, in the State of Nebraska, to wit: A tract of land located in the northeast quarter of section 20, township 9 north, range 21 west of the 6th principal meridian, Dawson County, Nebraska, described as follows: Beginning at the northeast corner of section 20; thence westerly on the north line of the northeast quarter of section 20 a distance of 2,360.8 feet; thence southeasterly 133 degrees, 47 minutes left a distance of 34.3 feet; thence continuing southeasterly 21 degrees, 49 minutes left a distance of 107.5 feet; thence continuing southeasterly 21 degrees, 49 minutes right a distance of 734.9 feet to point of curvature; thence continuing southeasterly on a 718.5-foot radius curve to the left (initial tangent of which coincides with the last-described course) a distance of 331.3 feet to point of tangency; thence continuing southeasterly tangent, a distance of 787.3 feet; thence continuing southeasterly 2 degrees, 11 minutes left a distance of 686.6 feet to a point on the east line of the northeast quarter; thence northerly on the east line a distance of 1,256.9 feet to the point of beginning, containing 39.04 acres, more or less.

Laws 1991, LB 500, § 1.